Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1803
Nebraska Potato Development Committee; membership; appointment; term; powers; expenses; termination.

(1) With the exception of the ex officio member, the Governor shall appoint an advisory committee to be known as the Nebraska Potato Development Committee. The committee shall be composed of three shippers and four growers from the industry and the vice chancellor of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources who shall be an ex officio member. The Director of Agriculture shall be the chairperson. The committee shall adopt and provide rules and regulations for the conduct of the affairs of the Division of Potato Development and advise the director regarding the appointment of the division head and any assistants as may be appointed. The members of the committee shall serve without pay but shall receive expenses incurred while on official business as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177. As the terms of office of such appointees expire, successors shall be appointed by the Governor for a period of two years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(2) The Nebraska Potato Development Committee terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 1945, c. 4, § 3, p. 70;

Laws 1947, c. 4, § 1, p. 60;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 2.

Nebraska Potato Council, see section 2-2811.